Missouri, session 2026, SB1228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 620.484, 620.490, 620.511, 620.512,
and 620.513, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 173.2800, 173.2805,
173.2850, 173.2855, 173.2860, and 173.2865, to read as follows:
[620.484.] 173.2800. The provisions of the Wagner-
Peyser Act (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 49 et seq.), as amended, are
hereby accepted by this state and the [division] office of
workforce development of the department of [economic] higher
education and workforce development is hereby designated and
constituted the agency of this state for the purposes of
said act. The [division] office shall establish and
maintain free public employment offices in such number and
in such places as may be necessary for the proper
administration of this chapter and for the purposes of
performing such functions as are within the purview of the
Wagner-Peyser Act.
[620.490.] 173.2805. The department of [economic]
higher education and workforce development shall promulgate
rules providing for the coordination of state and federal
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1228 2
job training resources administered by the department of
[economic] higher education and workforce development,
including the local workforce investment areas established
in the state to administer federal funds pursuant to the
federal Workforce Investment Act or its successor, for the
provision of assistance to businesses in this state relating
to the creation of new jobs in the state. The department of
higher education and workforce development shall include in
these rules the methods to be followed by any business
engaged in the creation of new jobs in state to ensure that
economically disadvantaged citizens receive opportunities
for employment in the new jobs created. No rule or portion
of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of this
section shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
[620.511.] 173.2850. 1. There is hereby established
the "Missouri Workforce Development Board", formerly known
as the Missouri workforce investment board, and hereinafter
referred to as "the board" in sections [620.511 to 620.513]
173.2850 to 173.2860.
2. The purpose of the board is to provide workforce
investment activities, through statewide and local workforce
investment systems, that increase the employment, retention,
and earnings of participants, and increase occupational
skill attainment by participants, and, as a result, improve
the quality of the workforce, reduce welfare dependency, and
enhance the productivity and competitiveness of the state of
Missouri. The board shall be the state's advisory board
pertaining to workforce preparation policy.
3. The board shall meet the requirements of the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act,
hereinafter referred to as the "WIOA", P.L. 113-128, as

SB 1228 3
amended. Should another federal law supplant the WIOA, all
references in sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2850 to
173.2860 to the WIOA shall apply as well to the new federal
law.
4. Composition of the board shall comply with the
WIOA. Board members appointed by the governor shall be
subject to the advice and consent of the senate. Consistent
with the requirements of the WIOA, the governor shall
designate one member of the board to be its chairperson.
5. Each member of the board shall serve for a term of
four years, subject to the pleasure of the governor, and
until a successor is duly appointed. In the event of a
vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment and said replacement
shall serve the remainder of the original appointee's
unexpired term.
6. Of the members initially appointed to the WIOA,
formerly known as the WIA, board, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of four years, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of three years, one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of two years, and one-fourth shall be
appointed for a term of one year.
7. WIOA board members shall receive no compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually
incurred in the performance of their duties.
8. The office of workforce development of the
department of higher education and workforce development may
include on its website a list of the names of the members of
the board, including the names of members of local workforce
development boards, along with information on how to contact
such boards.

SB 1228 4
[620.512.] 173.2855. 1. The board shall establish
bylaws governing its organization, operation, and procedure
consistent with sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2850 to
173.2860, and consistent with the WIOA.
2. The board shall meet at least four times each year
at the call of the chairperson.
3. In order to assure objective management and
oversight, the board shall not operate programs or provide
services directly to eligible participants, but shall exist
solely to plan, coordinate, and monitor the provisions of
such programs and services. A member of the board may not
vote on a matter under consideration by the board that
regards the provision of services by the member or by an
entity that the member represents or would provide direct
financial benefit to the member or the immediate family of
the member. A member of the board may not engage in any
other activity determined by the governor to constitute a
conflict of interest.
4. The composition and the roles and responsibilities
of the board membership may be amended to comply with any
succeeding federal or state legislative or regulatory
requirements governing workforce investment activities,
except that the procedure for such change shall be outlined
in state rules and regulations and adopted in the bylaws of
the board.
5. The department of [economic] higher education and
workforce development shall provide professional, technical,
and clerical staff for the board.
6. The board may promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to administer the provisions of sections [620.511
to 620.513] 173.2850 to 173.2860. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is

SB 1228 5
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
[620.513.] 173.2860. 1. The board shall assist the
governor with the functions described in Section 101(d) of
the WIOA, 29 U.S.C. Section [311d] 3111(d), and any
regulations issued pursuant to the WIOA.
2. The board shall submit an annual report of its
activities to the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president pro tem of the senate no
later than January thirty-first of each year.
3. Nothing in sections [620.511 to 620.513] 173.2850
to 173.2860 shall be construed to require or allow the board
to assume or supersede the statutory authority granted to,
or impose any duties or requirements on, the state
coordinating board for higher education, the governing
boards of the state's public colleges and universities, the
state board of education, or any local educational agencies.
173.2865. The department of higher education and
workforce development shall have authority to make grants to
eligible entities, as defined by the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act, or its successor, using
funds provided by the act, general revenue, or other funds
as appropriated by the general assembly.
✓